Hawaii statutes.
[§368-5] Penalties. Whoever
intentionally resists, prevents, impedes, or interferes with the commission or
any of its authorized agents or representatives in the performance of duties
pursuant to this chapter, or who in any manner intentionally violates an order
of the commission, shall be fined not more than $500, or imprisoned for not
more than ninety days, or both. [L 1988, c 219, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next